Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.430

Utilities—City may pay taxing districts involved after acquisition of private power facilities.

On and after January 1, 1951, whenever a city or town shall acquire electric generation, transmission and/or distribution properties which at the time of acquisition were in private ownership, the legislative body thereof may each year order payments made to all taxing districts within which any part of the acquired properties are located, in amounts not greater than the taxes, exclusive of excess levies voted by the people and/or levies made for the payment of bonded indebtedness pursuant to the provisions of Article VII, section 2 of the Constitution of this state, as now or hereafter amended, and/or by statutory provision, imposed on such properties in the last tax year in which said properties were in private ownership.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 15; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.430. Prior: 1951 c 217 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.